District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-1106

Collections by Clerk of Court to be deposited with Collector of Taxes and covered into Treasury

Repealed.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 586, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 165(a), (b)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-903 to 22-906.